Washington statutes.
RCW 28A.300.620

Mentor training program goals—Professional development curricula.

(1) In fiscal year 2017, the office of the superintendent of public instruction, in collaboration with the professional educator standards board and institutions of higher education with professional educator standards board-approved teacher preparation programs, shall develop mentor training program goals, and shall post the goals on its website.

(2) The office of the superintendent of public instruction is encouraged to develop professional development curricula aligned with the mentor training program goals required under this section. The purpose of this [these] curricula is to standardize mentorship training statewide in order to develop high quality mentors.

[ 2016 c 233 s 12.]